Massachusetts, session 194th, H3771.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 62 of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
In lieu of keeping and maintaining a book or other such form as approved by the
registrar, as required in this section, a class 1 dealer, licensed pursuant to sections 58 and 59,
shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section by recording and maintaining the
information required herein in said dealer’s electronic data management system, in a form and in
a format approved by the registrar; provided, however, that such form and format approved by
the registrar shall not compel the dealer to engage in duplicate recording and maintenance of the
information for each vehicle.
of 1